Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 977 of Title 36, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby established within the Insurance Department
the Oklahoma Commercial FORTIFIED Roof Program for the purpose of
encouraging the voluntary construction, retrofitting, and
certification of commercial roofing systems that meet enhanced wind
and hail resilience standards.
B. The program shall be based on the FORTIFIED Commercial or
successor commercial roofing standards established by the Insurance
Institute for Business and Home Safety (IBHS), or substantially
similar standards approved by the Insurance Commissioner. The
Commissioner may approve alternative or updated standards as

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1590 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

nece ssary to reflect evolving best practices for commercial roof
resilience in this state.
C. Structures eligible for the program shall include
commercial, school, industrial, agricultural, nonprofit, and
multifamily residential buildings containing five or more dwelling
units.
D. Subject to the availability of funds, the Department may:
1. Provide grants or rebates to assist with the cost of
qualifying commercial roof upgrades or replacements;
2. Partner with insurers to encourage premium credits,
discounts, or other incentives for participating property owners; or
3. Coordinate with state or federal resilience, mitigation, or
disaster-preparedness programs to leverage available funding.
E. Roof improvements made pursuant to this section shall be
inspected and certified by qualified professionals approved by the
Department. Certification documentation may be used by insurers for
underwriting, rating, or incentive purposes, subject to insurer
discretion any applicable state or federal law.
F. Participation in the program shall be voluntary and shall
not be construed to create an entitlement to funding.
G. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any
commercial property owner to retrofit or replace a roof or mandate
insurance premium reductions or underwriting decisions by insurers.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1590 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

H. The Commissioner shall promulgate any rules necessary for
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 12, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1590 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)